Hawaii statutes.
[§806D-2] Production of records. (a)
This section shall apply to any criminal process allowing for search of or
commanding production of records that are in the actual or constructive
possession of a recipient who is properly served outside the State, regardless
of whether the recipient or the records are physically located within the
State.

(b) When properly served with criminal process
issued under this section, the recipient shall provide the applicant all
records sought pursuant to the criminal process. The records shall be produced
within twenty business days of service of the criminal process, unless the
process requires earlier production. An applicant may consent to a recipient's
request for additional time to comply with the criminal process.

(c) Criminal process issued under this section
shall contain the following language in bold type on the first page of the
document:

"This [warrant,
subpoena, order] is issued pursuant to §806D-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes.
Production is due within twenty business days of service, unless a shorter time
is stated herein, or the applicant consents to a recipient's request for
additional time to comply."

(d) If the issuing court finds reason to
suspect that failure to produce records within twenty business days would cause
an adverse result, the criminal process may require production of records
within less than twenty business days. The court may reasonably extend the
time required for production of the records upon finding that the recipient has
shown good cause for requesting that extension and that an extension of time
would not cause an adverse result.

(e) When properly served with criminal process
issued under this section, a recipient who seeks to quash the criminal process may
seek relief from the issuing court only within the time originally required for
production of records. The issuing court shall hear and decide the motion no
later than five court days after the motion is filed. An applicant's consent,
under subsection (b), to a recipient's request for additional time to comply
with the criminal process shall not extend the date by which a recipient who
seeks relief may do so. [L 2012, c 325, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next